New York, session 2025-2026, A11225.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (c) of subdivision 1 of section 42 of the veter- 2 ans' services law is amended to read as follows: 3 (c) achieve a statewide goal for participation on state contracts by 4 service-disabled veteran-owned business enterprises of [six] eight 5 percent; 6 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15164-02-6